Michigan, session 2025-2026, SB1013.
People of the State of Michigan enact: Sec. 2027a. (1) It is an unfair method of competition and an unfair or deceptive act or practice in the business of insurance for a property and casualty insurer to use price optimization in ratemaking. (2) As used in this section: (a) âEngage in activities that result in insurance policy turnoverâ includes, but is not limited to, any of the following: (i) Shopping with other insurers for a lower premium. (ii) Canceling a policy before the expiration of the policy term. (iii) Failing to renew a policy at the renewal of the policy term. (iv) Complaining to the insurer or the insurerâs agent or representative. (b) âPrice optimizationâ means a practice to charge based on an insuredâs price tolerance that results in rate or premium adjustments that are not actuarially justified and based on factors that are unrelated to risk of loss or expense, including, but not limited to, any of the following: (i) Considering the likelihood that the insured will engage in activities that result in insurance policy turnover. (ii) Estimating the willingness of the insured to pay a higher premium compared to other insureds. (iii) Using any measure of a consumerâs or group of consumersâ price elasticity of demand. This act is ordered to take immediate effect. Secretary of the Senate Clerk of the House of Representatives Approved___________________________________________ ____________________________________________________ Governor